Georgia, session 2025_26, HB429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 2 of Article 10 of Chapter 5 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to ad valorem taxation of motor vehicles, is amended by revising subsection (a) of
Code Section 48-5-471, relating to motor vehicles subject to ad valorem taxation, as follows:
"(a) Every motor vehicle owned in this state by a natural person is, except as specifically
provided in Code Section 48-5-472.1, subject to ad valorem taxation by the various tax
jurisdictions authorized to impose an ad valorem tax on property as provided in Code
Section 48-5-473; provided, however, that under no circumstances shall such ad valorem
taxation be collected more than one time per calendar year with respect to the same motor
vehicle. Every vehicle owned in this state by an entity other than a natural person is,
H. B. 429 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 50 1190S
except as specifically provided in Code Section 48-5-472, subject to ad valorem taxation
by the various tax jurisdictions authorized to impose an ad valorem tax on property as
provided in Code Section 48-5-473; provided, however, that under no circumstances shall
such ad valorem taxation be collected more than one time per calendar year with respect
to the same motor vehicle. Taxes shall be charged against the owner of the property, if
known, and, if unknown, against the specific property itself."
SECTION 2.
Said part is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"48-5-472.1.
Motor vehicles owned by a natural person for which a title was issued in this state before
March 1, 2013, shall constitute a separate subclassification of motor vehicles within the
motor vehicle classification of tangible property for ad valorem taxation purposes. The
procedures prescribed in this part for returning motor vehicles for ad valorem taxation,
determining the applicable rates for taxation, and collecting the ad valorem taxes imposed
on motor vehicles shall not apply to such motor vehicles. Motor vehicles owned by a
natural person for which a title was issued in this state before March 1, 2013, shall not be
returned for ad valorem taxation, shall not be taxed, and no taxes shall be collected on such
motor vehicles."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, and shall be applicable to all taxable
years beginning on or after such date.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 429 (SUB)
- 2 -